Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-1005. Penalties.

Failure of the permittee or solid waste transporter to pay the fees assessed by the Division of Environmental Quality shall provide grounds for administrative or civil enforcement action. Sanctions may include civil penalties as provided in the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., or the revocation of the solid waste disposal or solid waste transporter permit.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 747, § 1; 1993, No. 1127, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2682.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

Subchapter 11
— Landfill Service Areas

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 870 and Acts 1991, No. 319 were held to be unconstitutional as applied to solid wastes originating outside the State of Arkansas in Southeast Ark. Landfill, Inc. v. Arkansas Dep't of Pollution Control and Ecology, 981 F.2d 372 (8th Cir. 1992).

Effective Dates.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 9: Mar. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some areas of the state are facing serious shortages of solid waste landfill capacity to the point of crisis; additional time is needed to develop regional solid waste management and planning and to increase the landfill capacity in the state to a level sufficient for the future needs of the state; and in order to address the serious financial and environmental problems, temporary restrictions should be placed on the expansion of landfill service areas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 619, § 8: Mar. 22, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that expediting the transfer of solid waste between solid waste management districts will significantly benefit the districts, the citizens of Arkansas, and the environment; and this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1101. Findings.

The General Assembly makes the following findings:

As of July 30, 1990, the landfill capacity in Arkansas stood at about four and three-tenths (4.3) years of landfill life for sixty-three (63) municipal solid waste landfills;

The present landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas is inadequate, and a landfill capacity of at least ten (10) years should be developed for solid waste generated in this state in order to provide sufficient protection for the public health, welfare, and safety and to provide for the future development of the state;

Adequate solid waste management planning has not been possible because of the lack of accurate statistics on industrial waste generation, landfill capacity, and use;

Legislation has been introduced in this session of the General Assembly to:

Require better reporting by industries using landfills;

Assist the development of adequate landfill capacity through regional funding and grants; and

Lengthen the usable life of existing landfills through recycling; and

Temporary restrictions on the disposal of out-of-district solid waste should be imposed for the purpose of:

Providing additional time for districts to obtain information necessary for regional planning;

Encouraging districts to develop regional solid waste management solutions; and

Developing a statewide and district landfill capacity of at least ten (10) years.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The references to “districts” in this section originally referred to regional solid waste planning districts and solid waste service areas. These entities were renamed as “regional solid waste management districts”. See § 8-6-703.

8-6-1102. Purpose — Construction.

As directed by Acts 1989, No. 870, the Arkansas Solid Waste Fact Finding Task Force [expired] has presented its findings and proposals. The task force report identifies serious and chronic deficiencies in how solid waste is managed in this state. The report is accompanied by legislative proposals which reaffirm the state's commitment to regional solid waste management embodied in Acts 1989, No. 870, and aim, through extensive revision of current law, to make regionalization a reality. The report and the task force's legislative proposals demonstrate that the state does not have sufficient understanding or control of the overall solid waste stream to realize its goal of regional solid waste management, much less a responsible recycling and source reduction program. These goals cannot be attained if the waste streams assigned to the respective regional solid waste planning districts continue to change during the crucial planning and development stages.

Federal law, 42 U.S.C. § 6941 et seq., has placed the burden of implementing regional solid waste management strategies upon the states. To this end, the General Assembly has embarked upon the difficult task of addressing the complex solid waste needs of the state on a regional basis. After giving due regard to all of the contingencies and exigencies inherent in planning a regional solid waste strategy, and after accommodating existing business expectations based upon waste streams originating from outside the Acts 1989, No. 870, regional solid waste planning districts, the General Assembly hereby enacts the following emergency measure as an essential component of its efforts to reform solid waste management in Arkansas.

This subchapter should be given a liberal construction so as to effectuate its remedial intent.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Arkansas Solid Waste Fact Finding Task Force, referred to in this section, was terminated upon the delivery of its final report to the General Assembly, which was due on or before January 1, 1991. See Acts 1989, No. 870, § 12.

Regional solid waste planning districts, referred to in this section, were renamed as “regional solid waste management districts”. See § 8-6-703.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 870, referred to in this section is codified as § 8-6-701 et seq.

8-6-1103. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” means a regional solid waste management board established pursuant to § 8-6-701 et seq., or a successor board to the powers of the board;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

“District” means a regional solid waste management district as established by § 8-6-701 et seq., or a successor district of a regional solid waste management district;

“Landfill” means a permitted landfill under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.; and

“Solid waste” means the same as provided by § 8-6-702.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 78; 2019, No. 910, § 2683.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 3, defined “board” as a “regional solid waste planning board or a solid waste service area board” and “district” as a “regional solid waste planning district or a solid waste services area”. However, these entities have been renamed as “regional solid waste management boards” and “regional solid waste management districts”. See § 8-6-703.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (3).

8-6-1104. Transportation of solid waste outside district.

In any instance in which a landfill has a useful life of less than one and one-half (1½) years, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may authorize any city utilizing that landfill to transport solid waste outside the boundaries of the regional solid waste management district. Provided, however, in no instance shall that authority be extended after a landfill with a useful life in excess of one and one-half (1½) years becomes available within the district for accepting the solid waste of the city.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 79; 2019, No. 910, § 2684.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-1105. Expansion outside district — Exemption.

This section shall apply until the later of:

July 1, 1992; or

Until the capacity of landfills in both the regional solid waste management district and the state reach a ten-year capacity.

Landfill capacity shall be determined by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

No existing landfill shall expand its service area outside the district in which it is located, except that existing landfills that on March 1, 1989, do not serve areas outside their respective districts shall not accept more than fifty (50) tons per day of solid waste originating from outside their districts.

Existing landfills that on March 1, 1989, serve areas outside of their respective districts shall not increase the total amount of solid waste originating from outside their districts by more than twenty percent (20%) annually of the total volume of solid waste received at the facility from outside their districts. The amount of solid waste shall be determined by weight.

No new landfill shall be allowed to receive solid waste outside the boundaries of the district in which it is located unless it is a landfill where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry or of wastes of a similar kind or character and such industry has commenced, prior to March 1, 1991, the process for obtaining a permit by issuing notice to the local government having jurisdiction, as required under the rules of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality.

No new applications for landfill permits seeking to dispose of solid waste originating outside of a district or that propose to dispose of solid waste originating from outside such district shall be accepted or processed by the Division of Environmental Quality or a regional solid waste management board, unless such applications were pending before the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality, on March 1, 1989.

Provided, the prohibition contained in this subsection shall not apply to new applications for landfill permits if the landfill is one where a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of wastes generated by the industry, or of wastes of a similar kind or character, and such industry has commenced, prior to March 1, 1991, the process for obtaining a permit by issuing notice to the local government having jurisdiction, as required under the rules of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality.

The director may grant an exemption from this section for solid waste brought into a district for the purpose of recycling or because the district where solid waste is generated does not have a landfill that meets applicable state rules or federal regulations. The exemption shall be subject to such terms and conditions as the director may deem appropriate.

A successor district may transport solid waste to any one (1) of the original districts of which the members of the successor district were a part.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 319, § 4; 1993, No. 619, § 4; 1999, No. 1164, § 80; 2019, No. 315, §§ 567-569; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2685-2687.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(3) and (c)(4)(B); and inserted “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b); added “or the Division of Environmental Quality” in (c)(3); substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission” in (c)(4)(A); and substituted “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in (c)(4)(A) and (c)(4)(B).

Subchapter 12
— Disposal of Incinerator Ash and Petroleum-Contaminated Soils

Effective Dates.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 11: Apr. 10, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the regulation of potentially harmful materials, specifically incinerator ash and petroleum contaminated soils, is essential to the protection and preservation of the public health and the environment. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 6: Mar. 17, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in the First Extraordinary Session of 1992 that incinerator ash and petroleum contaminated soils disposed of in landfills are potentially harmful materials to the environment of the State of Arkansas and thereby their regulation are essential to the preservation and protection of the environment and ecology of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, in order to more effectively regulate these environmental hazards, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1201. Legislative intent.

The purpose of this subchapter is to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing standards and promulgating rules by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for the disposal of potentially harmful materials, specifically incinerator ash and petroleum-contaminated soils in a permitted landfill.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 570.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

8-6-1202. Exceptions.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to persons who produce incinerator ash with an input capacity of twelve (12) tons of materials or less per day or to a manufacturing facility which utilizes solid waste generated on the premises of that manufacturing facility in incinerators, boilers, or industrial furnaces.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 4; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 1.

8-6-1203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Incinerator ash” means any tangible residue resulting from the incineration of solid waste;

“Monofill” means a waste disposal facility specifically designed for the sole disposal of incinerator ash;

“Person” means any state agency, municipality, governmental subdivision of the state or the United States, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, association, or other entity; and

“Petroleum-contaminated soils” means those soils which have been physically, chemically, or biologically altered by gasoline, diesel, kerosene, heating oil, jet fuel, or any other petroleum product.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 2.

8-6-1204. Powers and duties.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To adopt rules to meet the purposes of this subchapter;

To adopt specific design and operational criteria for the operation of a monofill;

To adopt criteria for the disposal of petroleum-contaminated soils in landfills; and

To administer and enforce all laws and rules relating to this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 571, 572.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1) and (4).

8-6-1205. Adoption of disposal criteria — Petroleum-contaminated soils.

Within eighteen (18) months after the date of enactment of this subchapter, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall, after consultation with the Advisory Committee on Petroleum Storage Tanks, adopt criteria for the disposal of petroleum-contaminated soils in landfills that are permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

In adopting such criteria, the commission shall follow the procedures applicable to the adoption of rules under § 8-4-202(a).

The criteria adopted by the commission shall:

Define the characteristics of the petroleum-contaminated soils that can be disposed of in permitted landfills;

Define the characteristics of landfills suitable for receipt of petroleum-contaminated soils;

Assure, to the extent practicable, that reasonable landfill capacity is available for disposal of petroleum-contaminated soils;

Consider the financial impact of such criteria on small businesses which need to dispose of petroleum-contaminated soils;

Consider whether affordable alternatives are available for the treatment or disposal of petroleum-contaminated soils; and

Be protective of public health and the environment.

The criteria adopted by the commission shall include a description of appropriate methods for collecting samples and conducting analyses of petroleum-contaminated soils that may be disposed of in permitted landfills to assure the representativeness of the soil mass.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 573.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “date of enactment of this subchapter,” Acts 1991, No. 1183, became effective on April 10, 1991.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2).

8-6-1206. Adoption of disposal criteria — Incinerator ash.

On or before July 1, 1992, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall adopt criteria for the disposal of incinerator ash in landfills that are permitted under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

In adopting such criteria, the commission shall follow the procedures applicable to the adoption of rules under § 8-4-202(a).

The criteria adopted by the commission shall include, but not be limited to, the monofilling of incinerator ash.

The monofill requirement created under this subchapter does not apply if the owner or operator demonstrates to the Division of Environmental Quality that the incinerator ash to be disposed of in the Class 1 landfill is received from incinerators that only combust yard waste or other natural vegetative debris, including vegetative storm debris, tree trimmings, and land-clearing debris.

All other requirements adopted under this subchapter apply to the disposal of incinerator ash described in this subsection.

As used in this subsection, “other natural vegetative debris” does not include any solid waste that can be classified as industrial, commercial, or construction and demolition waste.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 6; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 2; 2011, No. 342, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 574; 2019, No. 910, § 2688.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(1).

8-6-1207. Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this subchapter shall be subject to the civil penalties prescribed in § 8-6-204.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1183, § 7.

Subchapter 13
— Commercial Medical Waste Incineration Facilities

Effective Dates.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, § 11: Mar. 20, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the issuance of commercial medical waste incineration permits will have a significant impact on the citizens and environment of the State of Arkansas; that the Environmental Protection Agency is expected to issue rules and regulations pertaining to commercial medical waste incineration facilities in September of 1993; that it is necessary to delay the issuance of those permits until these federal regulations have been promulgated; that sufficient notification to the public of permit applications is necessary to protect the public interest; and that certain regulations governing the location of commercial medical waste incineration facilities are necessary to protect the public health and welfare. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 496, § 12: Mar. 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that both scientific understanding of the effects of medical waste incineration and the regulatory mechanisms for assuring safe operations are in a state of flux. The General Assembly deems this Act necessary to assure that commercial medical waste incineration facilities are sited and operated in accordance with the latest applicable laws and regulations, and that the operators of such facilities have the financial means necessary to maintain safe operations. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-1301. Legislative findings and purpose.

The General Assembly has found that there is an increased interest in obtaining permits from the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality for the purpose of constructing and operating commercial medical waste incineration facilities. The Clean Air Act in 42 U.S.C. § 7429(a)(1)(C) has directed the United States Environmental Protection Agency to promulgate regulations concerning these commercial medical waste incineration facilities. The General Assembly has determined that it is necessary to delay the issuance of permits to these commercial medical waste incineration facilities until those regulations are promulgated in order to ensure that any permits issued will be based on the latest available information concerning technology and safety as set forth in the federal regulations.

As scientific understanding of the potential public health and environmental impacts from large-scale medical waste incineration evolves, the General Assembly finds that continued caution regarding the development of commercial medical waste incineration facilities is necessary in order to protect the public health, safety, and welfare. Even though medical waste incinerators constitute major sources of potentially harmful emissions into the air, the United States Environmental Protection Agency has yet to promulgate technology standards necessary to assure safe operation. In the meantime, highly speculative ventures seek to profit from the regulatory uncertainty by promoting undercapitalized incineration facilities handling volumes of waste far in excess of that from the largest hospital.

This subchapter seeks to protect the public welfare by assuring that:

Commercial-scale medical waste incinerators beginning operation after March 1, 1995, will be in compliance with the most recent operating standards and rules;

The owner or operator of any commercial-scale medical waste incinerator beginning operation after March 1, 1995, shall demonstrate financial assurances necessary to ensure the proper operation, maintenance, and closure of such facilities;

A transfer of ownership or control of any commercial-scale medical waste incinerator will prompt regulatory officials to apply permitting standards and procedures as stringent as those applicable for the issuance of a new permit;

Generators of medical waste are encouraged to follow the hierarchy of waste management goals set out in the Arkansas Pollution Prevention Act, § 8-10-201 et seq.; and

Both generators of medical waste and regulatory officials will give proper consideration to alternative technologies for treating medical waste other than incineration.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, § 1; 1995, No. 496, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 81; 2019, No. 315, § 575; 2019, No. 910, § 2689.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 inserted “or the Division of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-6-1302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commercial medical waste incineration facility” means any facility accepting medical waste materials for treatment and disposal by incineration from an off-site source and operating the treatment and disposal facility as a business for profit;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Occupied structure” means a building or other structure:

Where any person lives or carries on a business or other calling;

Where people assemble for purposes of business, government, education, religion, entertainment, or public transportation;

Which is customarily used for overnight accommodation of persons whether or not a person is actually present. Each unit of a structure divided into separate units designed for occupancy is itself an occupied structure; or

Which has not yet been constructed or completed but for which a building permit, where applicable, has been issued and is valid on the date the application for the permit to construct and operate a commercial medical waste incineration facility is filed; and

“Person” means any individual or legal entity.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, § 2; 1993, No. 491, § 1; 1993, No. 861, § 1; 1995, No. 496, § 7; 1999, No. 1164, § 82; 2019, No. 910, § 2690.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2) and (3).

8-6-1303. Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to affect the authority of cities and counties to enact zoning regulations or procedures that control the location of medical waste facilities or sites.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed so as to achieve remedial intent.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, § 6; 1995, No. 496, § 1.

8-6-1304. Applicability.

This subchapter shall not apply to medical waste incineration facilities constructed and operating before March 20, 1992, or to medical waste incineration facilities operated by healthcare facilities for the purpose of disposing of medical waste.

This subchapter shall not apply to permits for renovations to medical waste incineration facilities constructed and operating before March 20, 1992, either through modification or additional construction, provided that such renovations are for the purpose of:

Complying with the rules or regulations or standards imposed by local, state, or United States Government agencies; or

Adding additional waste disposal capacity to a medical waste incineration facility constructed and operating before March 20, 1992.

The requirements of this subchapter shall apply to any commercial medical waste incineration facility that has not initiated operation prior to March 1, 1995.

For the purposes of construing this subsection and the application of this subchapter, initiation of operations has not occurred until the Division of Environmental Quality has approved the installation of all permitted pollution control equipment and the commercial medical waste incineration facility is receiving medical waste for incineration.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, § 7; 1995, No. 496, §§ 2, 3; 2019, No. 315, § 576; 2019, No. 910, § 2691.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules or” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(2).

8-6-1305. Permits — Procedure generally — Definition.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall not accept any applications or issue any permits for the construction or operation of any commercial medical waste incineration facilities until the federal regulations promulgated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7429(a)(1)(C) become effective or the United States Environmental Protection Agency's dioxin reassessment is finalized, whichever is later.

Any person applying for a permit or a permit modification to construct and operate a commercial medical waste incineration facility shall complete the following criteria at least thirty (30) days prior to submitting a permit application to the division:

Written notification by certified mail to each property owner and resident of any property adjacent to the proposed site of the intent to apply for a permit or permit modification; and

Publication of a public notice in the largest newspaper published in each county where the property which is the subject matter of the proposed commercial medical waste incineration facility permit or permit modification is located, and in at least one (1) newspaper of statewide circulation, of the intent to apply for a permit or a permit modification to construct and operate a commercial medical waste incineration facility.

The division shall provide written notice by certified mail of the proposed permit or permit modification to the mayor of the city and the county judge of the county where the property which is the subject matter of the permit application is located.

The division shall conduct a public hearing in the county in which the commercial medical waste incineration facility is to be located prior to the issuance of a final permit.

Notwithstanding the general provisions of other laws, permits for the construction or operation of commercial medical waste incineration facilities shall not be transferable upon a change in ownership or control of a commercial medical waste incineration facility.

Prior to any change in ownership or control of a commercial medical waste incineration facility, the proposed new owner must apply for a new permit and abide by the requirements of § 8-1-106.

The division shall process the application as one for a new permit and apply the most current statutes, rules, regulations, technological standards, and operational controls as conditions precedent for granting a permit or operational authority.

Any agreement or contract, written or oral, for a future transfer of operational control or ownership of a permitted commercial medical waste incineration facility or such an agreement or contract contingent upon the division's approval shall be subject to immediate disclosure to the division pursuant to § 8-1-106.

Upon such disclosure, the division shall cause the intent to transfer ownership or control to be publicly noticed and produce the disclosure documentation required by § 8-1-106 for public inspection.

After a reasonable period for public review, the division shall issue a written determination as to whether the intended transfer of ownership or control should be approved, subject to the right of appeal provided by § 8-1-106(e).

During the pendency of the division's and the public's review of the disclosure materials required by this section, any actions taken by the permittee or proposed transferee are at their own risk, and shall not be construed by the division or the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission as accruing equities in their favor.

As used in this subsection:

“Control” shall be presumed to reside with the owner, as defined herein, unless circumstances indicate that a person or entity other than an employee or agent of the owner is exercising ultimate decision-making authority regarding the construction or operation of a commercial medical waste incineration facility; and

“Corporate ownership” shall be defined as a controlling or majority interest in a commercial medical waste incineration facility, either through outright ownership of stock or other indicia of title, or any equitable right to such title as construed from the totality of the circumstances.

Any violation of this subsection shall constitute grounds for permit revocation and imposition of the civil and criminal penalties authorized by § 8-4-103.

If the original permit was issued more than one (1) year prior to the initiation of incineration activities at a commercial medical waste incineration facility, the division may review the conditions of the permit to determine whether good cause exists for modifying operating parameters to assure the maximum feasible control efficiency of emissions.

Any modifications proposed by the division must be supported by appropriate references to the scientific and engineering literature or documented studies conducted by the division.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, §§ 3, 4; 1995, No. 496, §§ 4, 5; 2019, No. 315, § 577; 2019, No. 910, § 2692.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules” in (e)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-6-1306. Permits — Limitations.

No permits may be issued by the Division of Environmental Quality for the construction or operation of a commercial medical waste incineration facility in which any of the following factors are present:

The location of the commercial medical waste incineration facility is within one (1) mile of any occupied structure;

The location of the commercial medical waste incineration facility is within an active fault zone or an area of high earthquake potential;

The location of the commercial medical waste incineration facility is within a regulatory floodway, as adopted by communities participating in the National Flood Insurance Program managed by the Federal Emergency Management Administration Commission; or

The location of the commercial medical waste incineration facility is within wetland areas.

Exceptions may be made to these requirements only by obtaining written permission from all real property owners and residents of any property adjacent to the site of the proposed commercial medical waste incineration facility.

History.

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 75, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2693.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a).

8-6-1307. Financial assurance guarantees.

Prior to initiating operations at a commercial medical waste incineration facility, the owner or operator must demonstrate:

Evidence of liability insurance in such amount as the Division of Environmental Quality may determine to be necessary for the protection of public health and safety and protection of the environment; and

Evidence of financial responsibility in such form and amount as the division may determine to be necessary to ensure that, upon abandonment, cessation, or interruption of the operation of the commercial medical waste incineration facility, all appropriate measures can be taken to prevent present and future damage to the public health and safety and to the environment.

In determining the adequacy of the evidence submitted, the division may consider credible evidence indicating that the permittee is undercapitalized, insolvent, or otherwise financially incapable of assuring environmentally sound operations at the permitted commercial medical waste incineration facility.

In determining the nature of financial assurance guarantees required by subsection (a) of this section, the division and the permittee shall follow, to the extent applicable, the federal regulations governing financial assurance of facilities governed by Subtitle D of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6941 et seq.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 496, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 2694.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Subchapter 14
— Residential Use of Landfills

8-6-1401. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to protect the public health and safety by requiring the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission to establish standards and promulgate rules regarding the post-closure use of solid waste landfills and adjacent areas for residential purposes.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 718, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 578.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.